Utah statutes.
63F-1-209.   Delegation of department staff to executive branch agencies --
Prohibition against executive branch agency information technology staff.
(1) (a)  The chief information officer shall assign department staff to serve
an agency in-house if the chief information officer and the executive branch
agency director jointly determine it is appropriate to provide information
technology services to:
(i)  the agency's unique mission critical functions and applications;
(ii)  the agency's participation in and use of statewide enterprise
architecture under the Division of Enterprise Technology; and
(iii)  the agency's use of coordinated technology services with other agencies
that share similar characteristics with the agency under the Division of
Integrated Technology.
(b) (i)  An agency may request the chief information officer to assign in-
house staff support from the department.
(ii)  The chief information officer shall respond to the agency's request for
in-house staff support in accordance with Subsection (1)(a).
(c)  The department shall enter into service agreements with an agency when
department staff is assigned in-house to the agency under the provisions of
this section.
(d)  An agency that receives in-house staff support assigned from the
department under the provision of this section is responsible for paying the
rates charged by the department for that staff as established under Section
63F-1-301.
(2) (a)  After July 1, 2006, an executive branch agency may not create a full-
time equivalent position or part-time position, or request an appropriation to
fund a full-time equivalent position or part-time position under the
provisions of Section 63J-1-201 for the purpose of providing information
technology services to the agency unless:
(i)  the chief information officer has approved a delegation under Section
63F-1-208; and
(ii)  the Division of Agency Services conducts an audit under Section
63F-1-604 and finds that the delegation of information technology services to
the agency meets the requirements of Section 63F-1-208.
(b)  The prohibition against a request for appropriation under Subsection
(2)(a) does not apply to a request for appropriation needed to pay rates
imposed under Subsection (1)(d).
